Utah statutes.
63I-4a-204.   Staff support -- Assistance to an agency or local entity.

(1)  The board may, within funds appropriated by the Legislature for this purpose, issue a request for proposals to contract with a private sector person or entity to:

(a)  provide staff support to the board;

(b)  assist the board in conducting its duties, including completing the inventory described in Part 3, Commercial Activities Inventory and Review; and

(c)  at the board's direction, assist an agency or a local entity to:

(i)  develop a business case for potential privatization of an activity, using the criteria described in Subsection 63I-4a-203(1);

(ii)  draft, issue, or evaluate a request for proposals to privatize an activity; or

(iii)  award a contract to privatize an activity.

(2)  The private sector person described in Subsection (1):

(a)  may not be an advocate for or against privatization; and

(b)  shall be neutral on the issue of privatization.



Enacted by Chapter 325, 2013 General Session

